Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 15 Eminent Domain
18-15-1002. Power of eminent domain.

(a)

The board of directors or commissioners of any levee or drainage district organized under the laws of the State of Arkansas are authorized and empowered to enter upon, take, and hold any lands or premises whatever, located either within or without the boundaries of the district, whether by purchase, grant, donation, devise, or otherwise, that may be necessary and proper for the location, relocation, construction, repair, or maintenance of any line of levees, drains, canals, or ditches, which may be authorized or necessary for any levee or drainage district to construct or make for the purpose of relieving any levee or land adjacent thereto from injury, want of drainage, or for the construction of any drain, ditch, or canal authorized to be constructed.

(b)

Any district having the authority to construct levees, ditches, drains, or canals is authorized and empowered to cut and remove trees, timber, and other material that may fall or otherwise encumber or endanger the levees, ditches, canals, drains, or any part thereof.

(c)

All levee and drainage districts shall have power to acquire by compromise or by agreement with the owner, or if the owner is a minor, an individual with mental illness, or if the lands belong to the estate of a deceased person, then with the guardian, curator, executor, or administrator, all property and right-of-way required by them.

(d)(1)

Levee and drainage districts may settle all claims for compensation or damages on account of right-of-way for the construction of levees, ditches, canals, or drains or material for the construction, maintenance, or repair of any levee, drain, canal, or ditch. The executor, administrator, or curator shall be responsible, on his or her bond, for the money or other things received in the settlement.

(2)

In case of a settlement, the owner, curator, administrator, or executor shall have the power to convey to the levee or drainage district the right-of-way, material, or other property so required. This conveyance shall vest the levee or drainage district with the title to the right-of-way or property acquired pursuant to this section.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 177, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1101.

18-15-1003. Appraisers.

(a)(1)

Circuit judges of all counties in which it becomes necessary to condemn right-of-way for the purpose of constructing levees, ditches, drains, or canals, upon the application of the president or secretary of any levee or drainage district, shall appoint three (3) disinterested resident landholders of the county, to be known as appraisers, to assess damages for the appropriation of land for levee and drainage purposes.

(2)

The appraisers shall hold their offices for the term of one (1) year and until their successors are duly appointed and qualified. In the event of a vacancy in the office or the removal by an appraiser from the county for which he or she was appointed, then it shall be the duty of the circuit judge, as soon as notified of the vacancy, to fill the unexpired term of the office by appointment.

(3)

The appointment shall be made in writing by the circuit judge of the county in which it is necessary to construct a levee, ditch, canal, or drain and shall be filed with the circuit court clerk by the judge, who shall record the appointment in a book to be kept by him or her for that purpose.

(b)(1)

The appraisers shall each take an oath before the clerk of the circuit court in their respective counties that they will make a just and true award of the compensation to be paid any landholder, or other person.

(2)

The oath shall be recorded in the book provided for the record of the appointment of the appraisers and shall authorize the appraisers severally to enter upon the discharge of their respective duties.

(c)

The compensation shall be:

(1)

The cash market value of the lands appropriated or intended to be appropriated for either levee, drain, ditch, or canal purposes;

(2)

The damage resulting to other lands of the same tract or obstruction to natural drainage, not exceeding the cost of artificial drainage, and the inconvenience, if any, of crossing either the levees, ditches, canals, or drains, from one (1) portion of the tract of land to the other; and

(3)

The value of crops and houses on the right-of-way, or the cost of moving the houses.

(d)(1)

In the event one (1) or more of the appraisers who may be appointed under the provisions of this section shall be interested in any property to be condemned, the interested appraisers shall not act in the condemnation of the property.

(2)

If one (1) or more of the appraisers shall refuse or neglect to act, it shall be the duty of the circuit judge to appoint another appraiser, whose appointment shall be recorded the same as the regular appraiser and who shall take the same oath of office.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 177, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1102.

18-15-1004. Petition — Appraisal — Summons.

(a)

Whenever any levee or drainage district deems it necessary to take, use, or appropriate any right-of-way, land material, or other property for levee, drain, ditch, or canal purposes pursuant to this section, §§18-15-1001 —18-15-1003, and §§18-15-1005 —18-15-1010, or when the right-of-way, land material, or other property has already been entered upon by it or has already been used, taken, or appropriated, then the levee or drainage district, by its president, secretary, attorney, or other authorized agent, may file a petition with the clerk of the circuit court of the county in which the property is situated, describing as near as may be practical the property taken or proposed to be taken and asking that the appraisers make an award to the owners of land or property.

(b)(1)

When the petition is filed, a copy of it shall be delivered to each of the appraisers. It shall then be the duty of the appraisers to assemble at some convenient time, enter upon the land or property which has been appropriated or is intended to be appropriated, and ascertain:

(A)

The fair market value of the land appropriated, or intended to be appropriated;

(B)

The damage which the construction of the levee will cause by the obstruction of natural drainage, not to exceed the cost of artificial drainage; and

(C)

The inconvenience of passing over the levee, ditch, drain, or canal or the cost of removing the houses.

(2)(A)

The appraisers shall reduce their findings to writing, giving the amount they award:

(i)

Per acre for the land appropriated;

(ii)

For inconvenience of crossing the levee, ditch, canal, or drain; and

(iii)

For the destruction of crops and houses or the cost of removing the houses upon the right-of-way.

(B)

The appraisers shall sign the report and file it with the clerk of the circuit court.

(3)

However, any levee or drainage district may have the appraisers go on the land and make the appraisal as provided in this section prior to filing its petition in court. Thereafter, if it becomes necessary to file the petition with the clerk of the circuit court of the county, the report of the appraisers may then be filed.

(c)(1)

The clerk shall immediately issue a summons directed to the sheriff of the county, together with a copy of the award attached to the summons, commanding him or her to serve the owner if he or she resides in the county or, if the land belongs to a minor, an individual with mental illness, or an estate, to serve the summons upon the guardian, curator, executor, or administrator of the owner and make return thereof.

(2)

However, if the owner is a nonresident of the county or is unknown to the officers of the levee or drainage district, it shall be the duty of the clerk to publish a warning order in some newspaper published in the county for four (4) insertions. The warning order may be in the following form and shall be dated and signed by the clerk:

“To
(name of supposed owner)
and all other persons having any claim or interest in and to the following described land, situated in
County, Arkansas, namely:
(here describe the land over which the levee or drainage passes according to U.S. Surveys). You are hereby warned to appear in this court within thirty (30) days, and file exceptions to the award which has been filed in this office by the levee and drainage appraisers of this county for the appropriation of the portion of the hereinbefore described land, for the construction or intended construction of a levee, ditch, canal, or drain, as the case may be, over and across the same.”

Click to view form.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 177, § 3; 1957, No. 100, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1103.

Publisher's Notes.

It was held in Staub v. Mud Slough Drainage Dist. No. 1, 216 Ark. 706, 227 S.W.2d 140 (1950), that the provisions of §§18-15-1004 and18-15-1005 limiting damages for obstruction of drainage to the cost of constructing artificial drainage were unconstitutional.

18-15-1005. Exception — Trial — Injunction.

(a)(1)

If no exception is filed by the owner within ten (10) days after service of summons or within ten (10) days of the last date of the publication of the warning order, or by the levee or drainage district within ten (10) days after award is filed, then it shall be the duty of the clerk of the circuit court to call the court's attention to the award, and failure to file exception thereto after notice having been given as provided.

(2)

Upon this information, the court shall proceed to enter a judgment condemning the property and land for the right-of-way purposes and a judgment in favor of the owner of the land against the levee or drainage district for the amount awarded by the appraisers.

(b)

However, in case exceptions are filed by either party within the time prescribed in this section, it shall be the duty of the clerk to docket the cause.

(c)

The petition originally filed by the levee or drainage district and the award of the appraisers shall constitute all necessary pleadings in the proceedings, and, in case a trial is demanded or requested by either party, the question shall be tried as other common law cases are tried.

(d)(1)

The owner of the land shall be entitled to recover the:

(A)

Value of the land appropriated or intended to be appropriated;

(B)

Obstruction to natural drainage not to exceed the amount necessary to construct artificial drainage;

(C)

Damage occasioned by the inconvenience of crossing the levee, ditch, canal, or drain from one (1) portion of the land to the other; and

(D)

Value of any crops or houses on the right-of-way or the cost of removing the crops or houses.

(2)

However, whenever any levee or drainage district shall cause any land or property to be appraised, as provided in this section, §§18-15-1001 —18-15-1004, and §§18-15-1006 —18-15-1010, it may enter upon the land and construct the levee, ditch, canal, or drain over and across it without paying the award until such time as the court in any term time shall so order or direct.

(e)(1)

It shall be the duty of the court or any county, circuit, or district judge to enjoin any owner of land from interfering with the construction of any levee, drain, ditch, or canal after an award has been made for the value of the land until such time as the court having proper jurisdiction shall render a final judgment.

(2)

In case of an appeal from any judgment rendered by the circuit court, the levee or drainage district, upon filing a supersedeas bond with the Clerk of the Supreme Court, shall be entitled to have the owner of the land enjoined from interfering with the construction of any levee, ditch, drain, or canal until the cause can be heard in the Supreme Court.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 177, § 3; 1957, No. 100, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1103.

Publisher's Notes.

It was held in Staub v. Mud Slough Drainage Dist. No. 1, 216 Ark. 706, 227 S.W.2d 140 (1950), that the provisions of §§18-15-1004 and18-15-1005 limiting damages for obstruction of drainage to the cost of constructing artificial drainage were unconstitutional.

18-15-1006. Payment of award — Adjudication of claim.

(a)(1)

If no exception shall be taken to the award of the appraisers and no appeal taken from any judgment rendered by the circuit court, then the levee or drainage district seeking to condemn the right-of-way shall pay the award to the person in whose favor the award is made, taking duplicate receipts therefor, one (1) of which shall be attached to the award and filed with the proceedings in the cause.

(2)

However, in the event the owner of the land, material, or property is unknown, or if it is uncertain who he or she is, or if there are conflicting claims to the land or to the award, or any part thereof, then the levee or drainage district shall pay the award to the clerk of the circuit court of the proper county for the owner and take the clerk's receipt from the owner and have it recorded in the book provided for the recording of petitions. The clerk and his or her sureties shall be answerable for the safekeeping of the money.

(b)(1)

Any claimants to the land may file an application in the circuit court and set up title to the land or property, and after giving notice to all adverse claimants by summons if they are residents of the county, and by warning order if nonresidents of the county or unknown, then the claimants shall have their claim to the money adjudicated and tried as other cases are tried under the rules and practice of the circuit court. Upon a final hearing, the circuit court shall direct a proper disposition of the money.

(2)

The judgment shall be a bar to recovery against the levee or drainage district for any other or further compensation or damages for the construction or maintenance of the levee, ditch, drain, or canal.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 177, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1104.

18-15-1007. Refusal to pay award upon abandonment of line.

Any levee or drainage district may refuse to pay the award which may have been made by any board or appraisers provided for in this section, §§18-15-1001 —18-15-1006, and §§18-15-1008 —18-15-1010, or the judgment of any court assessing the damages for right-of-way and may abandon the line and relocate the levee, drain, ditch, or canal without being liable for any award or judgment rendered in any proceeding for the condemnation of right-of-way, except as to the costs.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 177, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1105.

18-15-1008. Appropriation of land without owner's consent.

(a)

Whenever the board of directors or commissioners of any levee or drainage district may have appropriated, or shall appropriate, any land for right-of-way for the construction and maintenance of either levees, ditches, canals, or drains, and constructed levees or drains thereon without having procured the consent of the owner of the land to construct the levees or drains or without having procured the right-ofway, either by purchase, donations, or condemnation, the owner, when his or her cause of action has not been barred by the statute of limitations, shall have a cause of action against the board of directors or commissioners for the market value of the land at the time it was actually occupied.

(b)

The owner may also claim such damages for inconveniences of crossing from one (1) portion of the tract, then owned by the party seeking to recover, to the other portion of the tract, as he or she has sustained, and such damages as the owner may have sustained on account of obstruction of natural drainage to the tract of land over which the levee or drain may have been or shall be constructed, not to exceed the cost of constructing artificial drainage.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 177, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1108.

Publisher's Notes.

The limitation on the amount of damages for the obstruction of a landowner's natural drainage contained in this section was held to be unconstitutional in Staub v. Mud Slough Drainage Dist. No. 1, 216 Ark. 706, 227 S.W.2d 140 (1950).

18-15-1009. Limitation on actions and damages.

(a)

All actions for the recovery of damages against any levee or drainage district for the appropriation of land or the construction or maintenance of either levees or drains shall be instituted within one (1) year after the construction of the levees or drains, and not thereafter.

(b)

The recovery of damages on account of the construction or maintenance of levees or drains shall be limited and confined to the elements of damage mentioned and provided for in this section, §§18-15-1001 —18-15-1008, and §18-15-1010.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 177, §§ 9, 10; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 35-1109, 35-1110.

18-15-1010. Fees.

(a)

The appraisers provided for in this section and §§18-15-1001 —18-15-1009 shall be entitled to receive as compensation for viewing and appraising the land and property and making award of the damage therefor the sum of five dollars ($5.00) per day for each day in which the appraisers are actually engaged in this service. The sum shall be paid by the levee or drainage districts, as the case may be.

(b)(1)

In the event that there are exceptions filed to the award of any board or appraisers, the fees for conducting a trial of the cause shall be the same as are prescribed in ordinary proceedings in the common law court.

(2)

The fees shall be paid by the levee or drainage district in all cases in which the judgment of the circuit court is in excess of the award made by the appraisers. The landowners shall pay the cost accruing when the judgment of the circuit court does not exceed the amount awarded by the appraisers.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 177, §§ 6, 7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 35-1106, 35-1107.

18-15-1011. Acquisition of flowage and storage rights and other servitudes.

(a)(1)

Whenever it becomes necessary for any levee or drainage district, or levee and drainage district organized under the laws of the State of Arkansas, to acquire flowage and storage rights and other servitudes upon, over, and across any lands in the construction, operation, and maintenance of any floodway, reservoir, emergency reservoir, spillway, or diversion, then the district shall have the full power and authority to acquire the rights by compromise, settlement, or other agreement with the owner.

(2)

If the owner is a minor or an individual with mental illness or if the land belongs to the estate of a deceased person, then the curator, guardian, executor, or administrator with the approval of the probate division of circuit court shall have the right and power to make the compromise or settlement and to convey to the levee or drainage district the easements or other instruments or agreements covering the flowage and storage rights upon, over, and across any lands embraced in the floodway, reservoir, emergency reservoir, spillway, or diversion. The easements, contracts, or agreements, when so executed, shall vest in the districts the right to use the land for the purposes mentioned and set forth in the easement or contract.

(b)(1)

If it becomes necessary for any levee or drainage district, or levee and drainage district, to institute condemnation proceedings under Acts 1905, No. 53, and §14-120-217, to acquire flowage and storage rights and other rights of servitudes over, upon, and across any lands embraced in any floodway, reservoir, emergency reservoir, spillway, or diversion, then all suits shall be prosecuted in the name of the district. If the district so elects, all lands sought to be condemned for these purposes may be embraced and included in one (1) suit.

(2)

All of the several and respective owners thereof, or other person, firm, or corporation having an interest therein, shall be made parties defendant. It shall not be necessary or required that the district institute independent and separate suits against the several and respective owners of the land and rights sought to be condemned for these purposes.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 83, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 35-1112, 35-1113.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1905, No. 53, referred to in this section, may have been superseded by §§18-15-1001 —18-15-1010.

Subchapter 11

— Irrigation Companies

Effective Dates.

Acts 1909, No. 87, § 10: effective on passage.

18-15-1101. Private property generally.

(a)

All corporations organized in this state for the purpose of furnishing water to the public for irrigation of any lands or crops are authorized to exercise the right of eminent domain and to condemn, take, and use private property for the use of the corporations when necessary to carry out the purposes and objects of the corporations.

(b)

Whenever a corporation, in the construction of its canals, ditches, drains, conduits, aqueducts, dams, bulkheads, or water gates, or in laying pipes, shall deem it necessary or convenient to condemn, take, use, or occupy private property in the construction of its works or in making new lines of canals or other necessary works, the corporation may condemn, take, and use the private property, first making just compensation for the property, and proceeding as provided in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1909, No. 87, §§ 1, 2, p. 234; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 35-1201, 35-1202.

18-15-1102. Drawing or directing water from watercourse.

(a)

Whenever a corporation, in the construction of its system of canals, ditches, drains, conduits, aqueducts, or other means of conducting water, shall deem it necessary, it may, as provided in this subchapter, draw water from any river, lake, or creek by any means which the corporation may provide and, in general, do any act necessary or convenient in accomplishing the purpose contemplated by this subchapter.

(b)

Whenever a corporation shall propose to construct or extend its canals or works, or shall prepare to extend its system of canals or works, so as to connect with any river, lake, creek, or other watercourse, and to direct the water of the river, lake, creek, or other watercourse within or through its system of canals or works, it shall proceed as follows:

(1)(A)

The corporation shall cause to be made a survey of the lines along which it proposes to construct its canals or other works and of all lands or other property to be affected by the canals or other works, or by flowage, drainage, or otherwise.

(B)

For that purpose, the corporation by its officers or agents may enter upon any land for the purpose of making surveys and measurements or for obtaining any other necessary information relative to the construction or extension of the system of canals or other works, doing no unnecessary damage to the property; and

(2)

After the survey is made and the lines located it shall cause to be made a map showing the location of the lines extension, or improvements, and the lands necessary to be taken for the construction, extension, or improvements, and all lands or other property to be affected by flowage, drainage, or otherwise. The map shall be verified under oath by the surveyor making it as being just and correct as he or she verily believes.

History.

Acts 1909, No. 87, §§ 3, 4, p. 234; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 35-1203, 35-1204.

18-15-1103. Condemnation of property upon failure to obtain by consent, contract, or agreement.

In the event a corporation fails, upon application to individuals, corporations, or railroad companies to secure rights-of-way for the canals, drains, or other works by consent, contract, or agreement, then the corporation shall have the right to proceed to procure the condemnation of the property, lands, privileges, and easements in the manner prescribed by law for railroads, as provided by §§18-15-1201 —18-15-1207.

History.

Acts 1909, No. 87, § 5, p. 234; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1205.

18-15-1104. Construction across or under railroad.

A corporation shall have the right to construct its canals, ditches, drains, conduits, aqueducts, or pipelines across or under any railroad in this state, provided that it does not interfere with the traffic or business of the railroad company or corporation or in any way lessen the safety of transportation over the railroad.

History.

Acts 1909, No. 87, § 6, p. 234; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1206.

18-15-1105. Right-of-way and construction in city and town.

(a)

The city council of any city of the first class or city of the second class and the town councils of any incorporated towns shall have power to grant an irrigation corporation the right-of-way through the streets of the city or town, with the right to construct any canal, ditch, drain, conduit, aqueduct, pipeline, dam, bulkhead, water gate, or any other necessary works or improvements in the city or town.

(b)

However, if any property is damaged thereby, the irrigation corporation shall be liable in damages to the owner of the property, and the damages shall be assessed in the manner provided by law for assessing damages for the appropriation of the right-of-way through lands by railroad companies.

History.

Acts 1909, No. 87, § 7, p. 234; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1207.

18-15-1106. Construction and repair of bridges across canals.

(a)(1)

Whenever any irrigation corporation in this state constructs its canals, ditches, conduits, aqueducts, pipeline, or any of its works across any public road or highway, or where any public road or highway crosses any irrigation canal or branches thereof, the irrigation corporation shall be required to build a good and sufficient bridge across the canal or branches thereof. The bridge shall be built under the direction of the county judge of the county in which the road crosses the canal or branch thereof.

(2)

The irrigation corporation shall keep in good repair all approaches to the bridge so that the elevation or depression of the approaches shall be no greater than one perpendicular foot (1') for every five feet (5') of horizontal distance.

(b)

This subchapter shall not apply to the following counties: Ashley, Bradley, Benton, Boone, Carroll, Chicot, Clark, Clay, Columbia, Conway, Crawford, Crittenden, Cross, Dallas, Desha, Drew, Franklin, Garland, Greene, Hempstead, Hot Spring, Howard, Independence, Izard, Johnson, Lafayette, Logan, Lonoke, Madison, Marion, Miller, Mississippi, Monroe, Montgomery, Newton, Ouachita, Phillips, Pike, Polk, Pope, Pulaski, Saline, Scott, Searcy, Sebastian, Union, Van Buren, Washington, White, Woodruff, and Yell.

History.

Acts 1909, No. 87, § 8, p. 234; 1953, No. 159, § 1; 1953, No. 407, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1208.

18-15-1107. Supply of water to adjacent landowners.

(a)

Water shall be supplied to the owners of all lands adjacent to any canal constructed or operated by any such corporation, whenever practicable, upon equal terms and at uniform rates, which shall always be equitable and fair.

(b)

However, this subchapter shall not apply to Arkansas County, and Sections 20, 21, 25, 26, 27, 29, 32, 33, 34, 35, and 36, all in Township Two (2) South, Range Six (6) West, of the Fifth Principal Meridian in Prairie County, Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1909, No. 87, § 9, p. 234; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1209.

Subchapter 12

— Railroad, Telegraph, and Telephone Companies

Effective Dates.

Acts 1873, No. 123, § 11: effective on passage.

Acts 1885, No. 107, § 14: effective on passage.

18-15-1201. Definition.

The words “right-of-way”, as used in this subchapter, shall mean all grounds necessary for side tracks, turnouts, depots, workshops, water stations, and other necessary buildings.

History.

Acts 1873, No. 123, § 8, p. 290; C. & M. Dig., § 4003; Pope's Dig., § 5005; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-207.

18-15-1202. Petition for condemnation.

(a)(1)

Any railroad, telegraph, or telephone company, organized under the laws of this state, after having surveyed and located its lines of railroad, telegraph, or telephone, in all cases in which the companies fail to obtain the right-of-way over the property by agreement with the owner of the property through which the lines of railroad, telegraph, or telephone may be located, shall apply to the circuit court of the county in which the property is situated.

(2)

Application shall be made by petition to have the damages for the right-of-way assessed, giving the owner of the property at least ten (10) days' notice in writing by certified mail, return receipt requested, of the time and place where the petition will be heard.

(b)(1)

In case the property sought to be condemned is owned by any individual or corporation and is located in more than one (1) county, the petition may be filed in any circuit court having jurisdiction in any county in which the whole or a part of the property may be located.

(2)

Proceedings had in the circuit court will apply to all property designated in the petition.

(c)

However, if the owner of the property is a nonresident of the state, an infant, or person of unsound mind, notice shall be given as follows:

(1)(A)

By publication in any newspaper in the county which is authorized by law to publish legal notices.

(B)

The notice shall be published for the same length of time as may be required in other civil causes.

(2)

If there is no such newspaper published in the county, then the publication shall be made in some newspaper designated by the circuit clerk, and one (1) written or printed notice thereof shall be posted on the door of the courthouse of the county; and

(3)

In writing by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address of the owners of the property as it appears on the records in the office of the county sheriff or county tax assessor for the mailing of statements of taxes as provided in §26-35-705.

(d)

The petition shall, nearly as may be, describe the lands over which the road is located and for which damages are asked to be assessed, whether improved or unimproved, and be sworn to.

History.

Acts 1873, No. 123, §§ 3, 5, p. 290; 1885, No. 107, § 13, p. 176; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3992-3994, 3996; Pope's Dig., §§ 4994-4996, 4998; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 35-201, 35-203; Acts 1999, No. 1236, § 2.

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment added (c)(3); inserted “by certified mail return receipt requested” following “in writing” in (a)(2); added “as follows” at the end of the introductory language in (c); and made stylistic changes.

18-15-1203. Appointment of guardian ad litem.

In all cases of infants or persons with mental illness, when no legal representative or guardian appears in their behalf at the hearing, it shall be the duty of the court to appoint a guardian ad litem, who shall represent their interests for all purposes.

History.

Acts 1873, No. 123, § 4, p. 290; C. & M. Dig., § 3995; Pope's Dig., § 4997; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-202.

18-15-1204. Assessment of damages by jury.

(a)

It shall be the duty of the court to impanel a jury of twelve (12) persons, as in other civil cases, to ascertain the amount of compensation which the company shall pay. The matter shall proceed and be determined as other civil causes.

(b)

The amount of damages to be paid the owner of the lands for the right-of-way for the use of the company shall be determined and assessed irrespective of any benefit the owner may receive from any improvement proposed by the company.

History.

Acts 1873, No. 123, § 5, p. 290; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3997, 3998; Pope's Dig., §§ 4999, 5000; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-204.

18-15-1205. Payment or deposit of damages and costs.

(a)

In all cases in which damages for the right-of-way for the use of any railroad company have been assessed in the manner provided in this subchapter, it shall be the duty of the railroad company to deposit with the court or pay to the owners the amount so assessed and pay such costs as, in the discretion of the court, may be adjudged against it, within thirty (30) days after the assessment.

(b)

After payment, it shall be lawful for the railroad company to enter upon, use, and have the right-of-way over the lands forever.

History.

Acts 1873, No. 123, § 6, p. 290; C. & M. Dig., § 3999; Pope's Dig., § 5001; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-205.

18-15-1206. Deposit upon controversy.

(a)

In cases in which the determination of questions in controversy in the proceedings is likely to retard the progress of work on or the business of the railroad company, the court, or judge in vacation, shall designate an amount of money to be deposited by the company, subject to the order of the court, for the purpose of making the compensation, when the amount thereof has been assessed and the judge shall designate the place of the deposit.

(b)

Whenever the deposit has been made, in compliance with the order of the court or judge, it shall be lawful for the company to enter upon the lands and proceed with the company's work through and over the lands in controversy prior to the assessment and payment of damages for the use and right.

History.

Acts 1873, No. 123, § 7, p. 290; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4000, 4001; Pope's Dig., §§ 5002, 5003; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-206.

18-15-1207. Failure to pay or deposit.

In all cases in which the company shall not pay or deposit the amount of damages assessed within thirty (30) days after the assessment the company shall forfeit all rights in the premises.

History.

Acts 1873, No. 123, § 7, p. 290; C. & M. Dig., § 4002; Pope's Dig., §§ 5004; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-206.

Subchapter 13

— Mineral Oil, Petroleum, Natural Gas, and Lumber Companies

Effective Dates.

Acts 1905, No. 228, § 5: effective on passage.

Acts 1925, No. 103, § 3: approved Feb. 24, 1925. Emergency clause provided: “This act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act shall be in full force from and after its passage.”

18-15-1301. Pipelines and logging and tram roads.

(a)

Any corporation organized by virtue of the laws of this state for the purpose of developing and producing mineral oil, petroleum, or natural gas in this state, and marketing it, or transporting or conveying it by means of pipes from the point of production to any other point, either to refine or to market the oil or to conduct the gas to any point to be used for heat or lights and any corporation organized under the laws of this state for the purpose of manufacturing lumber, and which may find it necessary or expedient to lay out and build a logging railroad or tram road at least five (5) miles in length in order to reach its timber may:

(1)

Construct, operate, and maintain a line of pipe for that purpose along and under the public highways and streets of cities and towns with the consent of the authorities thereof; and

(2)

Construct logging roads or tramways over and across the lands of any individual or corporation, or across and under the waters and over any lands of the state and on the lands of individuals, and along, under, or parallel with the rights-of-way of railroads and the turnpikes of this state.

(b)

The ordinary use of the highways, turnpikes, and railroad rights-of-way shall not be obstructed thereby, nor the navigation of any waters impeded. Just compensation shall be paid to the owners of the land, railroad rights-of-way, or turnpikes, by reason of the occupation of the lands, railroads rights-of-ways, or turnpikes by the pipeline or by the log roads.

(c)

The right-of-way for any logging railroad or tram road shall not exceed in width fifty feet (50').

History.

Acts 1905, No. 228, §§ 1, 3, p. 577; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3969, 3971; Acts 1925, No. 103, §§ 1, 2; Pope's Dig., §§ 4971, 4973; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 35-601, 35-603.

18-15-1302. Right to enter, survey, etc. — Plat or map.

(a)(1)

Whenever a corporation desires to construct a pipeline or build a logging railway upon or under the lands of individuals, or right-of-way of any railroad, or any turnpike, the corporation, by its agents, shall have the right to enter peacefully upon the lands or rights-of-way and survey, locate, and lay out its pipeline, thereon, or tram road or logging road.

(2)

However, the corporation shall be liable for any damages that may result by reason of such acts.

(b)

The corporation shall designate on a plat or map to be made and filed with the county clerk of the county the width of the strip of land needed to be condemned for its purposes, the land's location, and the depth to which the pipes are to be laid.

History.

Acts 1905, No. 228, § 3, p. 577; C. & M. Dig., § 3971; Acts 1925, No. 103, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 4973; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-603.

18-15-1303. Procedure for condemnation.

In the event any company fails, upon application to individuals, railroads, or turnpike companies, to secure the right-of-way by consent, contract, or agreement, then the corporation shall have the right to proceed to procure the condemnation of the property, lands, rights, privileges, and easements in the manner provided by law for taking private property for right-of-way for railroads as provided by §§18-15-1201 —18-15-1207, including the procedure for providing notice by publication and by certified mail in §18-15-1202.

History.

Acts 1905, No. 228, § 2, p. 577; C. & M. Dig., § 3970; Pope's Dig., § 4972; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-602; Acts 1999, No. 1236, § 3.

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment added “including the procedure for providing notice by publication and by certified mail in §18-15-1202” at the end.

18-15-1304. Abandonment of logging railroad or tram road.

When a logging railroad or tram road is abandoned, the right-of-way shall revert to the owners of the lands over which it crosses.

History.

Acts 1905, No. 228, § 3, p. 577; C. & M. Dig., § 3971; Acts 1925, No. 103, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 4973; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-603.

Subchapter 14

— Cemeteries

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§18-15-1401 —18-15-1407 may not apply to §18-15-1408 which was enacted subsequently.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1935, No. 163, § 8: approved Mar. 21, 1935. Emergency clause provided: “This act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

18-15-1401. Right of eminent domain to take land for burial purposes.

(a)

All cities of the first class and cities of the second class and incorporated towns, cemetery or burial associations, and persons owning land used for public burial purposes in the State of Arkansas are given and granted the right of eminent domain to condemn, take, and use land for public burial purposes.

(b)

Power of eminent domain granted by this section may also be used to acquire land for the burial of veterans of the United States Armed Forces and their dependents, and the land may be transferred to the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, any other agency of the federal government, or to any other entity for use as a cemetery for veterans of the United States Armed Forces and their dependents.

(c)

All entities granted the power of eminent domain under this section may accept donations from individuals or other legal entities for the purpose of compensating landowners for property acquired by eminent domain.

(d)

The right of eminent domain granted by this section shall be exercised as provided in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 163, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 9965; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-801; Acts 1989, No. 542, § 1.

18-15-1402. Consent of two-thirds of members or owners required.

No property shall be condemned and taken for public burial purposes by any city of the first class or city of the second class or incorporated town, cemetery or burial association, or persons owning land used for public burial purposes without the concurrence in the bylaws, resolutions, or ordinances directing the same of two-thirds (2/3) of the whole number of members elected to the council of the city or town, or without the consent of two-thirds (2/3) of the members of the cemetery or burial association, and persons owning land used for public burial purposes.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 163, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 9966; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-802.